Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26 Criminal Detention Facilities Standards
12-27-137. Confidentiality of emergency preparedness documents.

The following sections of the Division of Correction's official Emergency Preparedness Manual are confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.:

Command Post Checklist;

Command Notifications;

Internal Notifications;

External Notifications;

Recall Notifications;

Family Notifications;

Tactical Systems;

Command Structure;

Emergency Locations;

Emergency Equipment;

Emergency Deactivation;

Emergency Plans;

Work Stoppage Directive;

Evacuation Diagrams; and

Facility Maps, Utility Locations.

Any document described in subsection (a) of this section shall become available for public viewing if it becomes part of a criminal investigation, at the time that investigation is concluded and it is not otherwise exempt by law.

Any amendments or additions to the sections of the manual described in subsection (a) of this section shall be reviewed annually by the Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction's” for “Department of Correction's” in the introductory language of (a).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reallocation of resources, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1291, § 24. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 1142, § 8; 2003, No. 370, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a), (b), and (c)(2).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 1, provided:

“Intent.

“(a)Ethnic minorities appear to be over represented in the population of persons who are involved in the criminal justice system, charged as defendants, convicted, and incarcerated throughout the United States criminal justice systems.

“(b)It is the responsibility of criminal justice agencies and the courts in the State of Arkansas to ensure that all actions taken are based upon reasons other than the race of the defendant.

“(c)In order to allow the General Assembly to conduct a thorough review of the Arkansas criminal justice process, information on actions taken by criminal justice agencies and the courts must be reported in a timely, uniform, and consistent manner.”

As enacted by Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 4, subdivision (a)(1) began:

“Beginning July 31, 2003, and on July 31 of each year thereafter,”.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “and the Commission on Disparity in Sentencing” in (a)(1); and deleted “and the commission” in (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(1) and throughout (c).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Department of Correction annual report, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 305, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 5; 2005, No. 1962, § 48.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2005, No. 684, § 1, subsection (c) of this section read “… on the effective date of this section …”.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “and rules promulgated under the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq.” for “and regulations” in (b); and deleted (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 741, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 760.

12-27-138. [Repealed.]

The Board of Corrections may promulgate rules to allow inmates to participate in a meritorious furlough program which include a requirement that the county sheriff and the chief of police of the city or town, if applicable, shall be notified if an inmate will be present within their jurisdiction while on furlough.

The rules referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall not require the county sheriff or the chief of police of the city or town, if applicable, of the jurisdiction in which an inmate will be present on furlough to approve the granting of the furlough.

(1)All Arkansas-certified law enforcement officers are authorized to escort inmates on emergency furlough.

The board may promulgate rules necessary to implement subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1371, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 889.

12-27-140. Division of Community Correction annual report.

(1)On July 31 of each year, the Division of Community Correction shall submit an annual report to the Legislative Council showing the number of persons sentenced or transferred to the division during the fiscal year for each criminal offense classification.

Persons sentenced or transferred for multiple offenses shall be noted in the report.

The report shall include a breakdown by race of all persons charged in each criminal offense classification.

The division shall cooperate with and upon request make presentations and provide various reports, to the extent the division's budget will allow, to the Legislative Council concerning division policy and criteria on discretionary offender programs and services.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 4; 2005, No. 1962, § 47; 2019, No. 910, §§ 761, 762.

12-27-141. [Repealed.]

The Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction may enter into professional services contracts for medical services for a contract period not to exceed ten (10) years.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the professional services contracts for medical services shall comply with all other provisions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq., and rules promulgated under the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 684, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 21; 2019, No. 910, § 763.

12-27-143. Award of service weapon upon retirement or death.

When a Division of Correction employee retires from service with at least twenty (20) years of service or dies while still employed with the division, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased employee, the Director of the Division of Correction may award the service weapon carried by the employee at the time of his or her retirement from service or death to:

The employee;

The employee's spouse if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm; or

The surviving child of the employee if there is no surviving spouse and the surviving child is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

If there is more than one (1) surviving child of the employee, the service weapon may be awarded to the oldest surviving child if he or she is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

If the oldest of the surviving children is not eligible to possess a firearm under applicable state and federal laws, then the service weapon may be awarded to the next-oldest surviving child if he or she is eligible to possess a firearm under applicable state and federal laws.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 764, changed “department” to “division” in this section before “may award”. However, Acts 2019, No. 106, § 1, specifically amended this section to change “department” to the “Director of the Department of Correction”. Pursuant to Acts 2019, No. 910, § 739, the Director of the Department of Correction is now known as the “Director of the Division of Correction”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 106 substituted “Director of the Department of Correction” for “the department” in the introductory language; and added (3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 181, § 1; 2019, No. 106, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 764.

12-27-144. Division of Community Correction — Receipt of grant money for certain purposes.

The Division of Community Correction may receive money from any source to be deposited into the Accountability Court Fund to be used for adult and juvenile specialty court programs as defined under § 16-10-139, based upon a formula to be developed by the Arkansas Judicial Council, Inc., reviewed by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee, and approved by the Legislative Council.

The division may promulgate rules to implement this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in the section heading and (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

The offense and sentence for any conviction for which the inmate is incarcerated, including:

Whether the inmate is subject to a suspended sentence, if known; and

The terms of the suspended sentence, if applicable;

Beginning July 1, 2015, the disciplinary record for each inmate.

As used in this subsection, “disciplinary record” means a list of each major disciplinary violation after July 1, 2015, for which the inmate has been found guilty.

Additionally, the list and the date of major disciplinary violations for which the inmate was found guilty shall be displayed during the period the inmate is being considered for transfer to parole;

Risk assessment scores completed after April 1, 2015.

Risk assessment scores under this subdivision (a)(3) shall include the name of the state agency that completed the risk assessment, the date the risk assessment was conducted, and the level of assessment.

Information by the Division of Correction regarding how risk assessments are scored shall also be posted;

Custody status and level;

Any known aliases;

A current photograph of the inmate;

A complete felony conviction summary to the extent that information is available to the Division of Correction;

To the extent the information is available to the Division of Correction, if an order of protection, no contact order, or other order from an in-state or out-of-state court that prohibits contact or communication with another person is in place;

Any programs completed by the inmate while in custody; and

An inmate's parole eligibility date or date he or she is to be released from incarceration as well as a general explanation of how an inmate's parole eligibility date is calculated, including good time credits.

Any offense and sentence for which the probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction is being supervised, including:

Whether the probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction is subject to a suspended sentence, if known; and

The terms of the suspended sentence, if applicable;

A complete felony conviction summary to the extent that information is available to the Division of Community Correction;

Risk assessment scores completed after April 1, 2015.

Risk assessment scores under this subdivision (b)(1)(C) shall include the name of the state agency that completed the risk assessment, the date the risk assessment was conducted, and the level of assessment.

Information by the Division of Community Correction regarding how risk assessments are scored shall also be posted;

Any known aliases;

A most recent photograph of the probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction;

To the extent the information is available to the Division of Community Correction, if an order of protection, no-contact order, or other order from an in-state or out-of-state court that prohibits contact or communication with another person is in place;

All major disciplinary violations while the probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction was incarcerated and the date of the major disciplinary violation disposition;

Any programs completed by the probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction while on supervision and the date of completion; and

A list of previous revocation offenses while on probation or parole and date of revocation.

The Division of Community Correction shall develop a plan to establish a method for a victim of a crime committed by a probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction to directly and easily access the information listed under this subsection.

When possible, court-generated records listed under this section shall be electronic copies of the actual court documents.

All victim information included in the court-generated records under this subsection shall be redacted.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “A most” for “Most” in (b)(1)(E); in (b)(1)(F), substituted “no-contact” for “no contact” preceding “order”; and, in (b)(1)(G), substituted “probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Department of Community Correction” for “inmate”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” throughout (a);and substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a) and (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a) and (b).

Meaning of "this act". Acts 2015, No. 1265, codified as §§12-1-102, 12-12-1201, 12-12-1202, 12-27-113, 12-27-125, 12-27-145 — 12-27-147, 16-93-202, and 16-93-213.

Internal Notifications;

External Notifications;

Recall Notifications;

Family Notifications;

Tactical Systems;

Command Structure;

Emergency Locations;

Emergency Equipment;

Emergency Deactivation;

Emergency Plans;

Work Stoppage Directive;

Evacuation Diagrams; and

Facility Maps, Utility Locations.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in the introductory language of (a).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 765.

12-27-145. Records to be posted on a public website — Definition.

To the extent permitted by federal law, the Division of Correction shall post on the Division of Correction's website the following information concerning an inmate:

(1)To the extent permitted by federal law, the Division of Community Correction shall post on the Division of Community Correction's website the following information concerning a probationer, parolee, or other person under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction who has absconded or has had a warrant issued for his or her arrest for evading supervision:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 7; 2017, No. 250, § 22; 2019, No. 910, § 766.

12-27-146. Tracking an inmate or person being supervised who is serving a suspended sentence.

The Division of Community Correction shall track a person under its supervision who is serving a suspended sentence and notify the prosecuting attorney with jurisdiction over the person's suspended sentence if the division knows that the person has not complied with the terms and conditions of the suspended sentence.

A circuit court shall notify the division of all suspended sentences to which the circuit court sentences a defendant, including the defendant's name, the terms and conditions of the suspended sentence, and the length of the suspended sentence.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 767.

12-27-147. Rulemaking and administrative directive reporting requirement.

A rule implemented by the Board of Corrections, Division of Correction, Division of Community Correction, or the Parole Board pertaining to this act shall be approved by the appropriate legislative committee before becoming effective.

Any administrative directive or board policy pertaining to this act implemented by the Board of Corrections, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, or the Parole Board shall be reported to the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 768.

12-27-148. Confidentiality of emergency preparedness document of the Division of Community Correction.

The following sections of the Division of Community Correction's official Emergency Preparedness Manual are confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.:

Command Post Checklist;

Command Notifications;

If a section of the manual described in subsection (a) of this section becomes part of a criminal investigation, the section is available for public viewing at the conclusion of the criminal investigation if the section is not otherwise exempt from disclosure by law.

An amendment or addition to a section of the manual described in subsection (a) of this section shall be reviewed annually by the Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 376, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
769.

12-27-149. Division of Community Correction — Sufficient staffing guidelines.

For the purposes of maintaining a sufficiently trained and specialized staff of probation and parole officers, the Division of Community Correction shall establish staffing guidelines using evidence-based practices to develop ratios between the number of high-risk, medium-risk, and low-risk probationers and parolees and the probation officers and parole officers assigned to the high-risk, medium-risk, and low-risk probationers and parolees in order to maximize the effectiveness of the monitoring ability of the probation officers and parole officers.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 423, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 770.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in the section heading and the section.

Subchapter 2

— Pay-for-Success Act

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-27-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Pay-for-Success Act”.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 9.

12-27-202. Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

Incarceration and reincarceration are costly for the government and for taxpayers;

Certain intervention measures have been found to reduce reincarceration rates;

Pay-for-success contracts can serve as an effective tool for addressing certain issues concerning Arkansas correctional facilities, including overcrowding, by enabling the state to finance programs aimed at reducing recidivism rates; and

It is in the best interests of Arkansas residents to encourage and enable the Division of Community Correction to obtain financing for certain intervention services to reduce the recidivism rate in Arkansas correctional facilities.

The General Assembly intends for this subchapter to enable the division to obtain private financing for intervention services on a pay-for-success basis to reduce the reincarceration rate in Arkansas correctional facilities.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a)(4); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 9; 2019, No. 910, §§ 771, 772.

12-27-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Incarcerated” means the condition of being committed to a state correctional facility; and

“Pay-for-success program” means a program in which the Division of Community Correction pays for intervention services only if certain performance targets are met, including without limitation a reduction in the reincarceration rate in Arkansas correctional facilities through intervention measures that focus on improving personal responsibility and decision making.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (2).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 773.

12-27-204. Pay-for-success programs.

The Division of Community Correction may enter into an agreement with entities, including without limitation licensed or accredited, as applicable, community-based providers specializing in behavioral health, case management, and job placement services, and two-year or four-year public universities to create a pay-for-success program for incarcerated individuals or individuals on parole or probation that requires the division to pay for the intervention services only if the performance targets stated in the agreement are achieved.

Before entering into an agreement under subsection (a) of this section, the division shall:

Calculate the amount and timing of the payments that would be earned by the entity providing the intervention services during each year of the agreement if the performance targets are achieved; and

Make a written determination that the agreement will result in specific performance improvements and budgetary savings if the performance targets are achieved.

An agreement entered into under subsection (a) of this section:

Shall include the following:

A requirement that payment be conditioned on the achievement of specific outcomes based on defined performance targets; and

An agreement with an independent third party to evaluate the pay-for-success program to determine whether the performance targets have been achieved;

May contain a graduated payment schedule to allow for varying payments based on different levels of performance targets; and

May include without limitation an agreement with one (1) or more private entities regarding the following:

One (1) or more loans to fund the pay-for-success program's delivery and operations;

One (1) or more guarantees for loans obtained under this section;

Payment based on reduced rates of reincarceration or other agreed-upon measures of success; and

Oversight and implementation of the pay-for-success program, including without limitation the following:

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” and “division” for “department”; and substituted “division” for “department” in the introductory language of (b).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 44, provided, in part, that all laws relating to the state penitentiary which were not specifically repealed by, or in conflict with, Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50 would apply to the Department of Correction.

Effective Dates. Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 46: Mar. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order better to effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a Department of Correction to effectuate such rehabilitation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 1, 1968.”

Acts 1969, No. 377, § 13: Apr. 9, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that persons under the age of 21 years who are convicted of a felony in this state, must now be committed to the Department of Correction, thereby severely minimizing the opportunities of rehabilitation of such persons, and that immediate steps must be taken to provide for the establishment of an intermediate reformatory wherein educational opportunities for training, education and rehabilitation training may be established for the benefit of such convicted felons. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 466, § 6: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Correction is in the process of constructing new facilities and will in the future build others, and that inmates will be classified and sent to units or centers that will be designated by the Board of Correction as to what type or age of inmates each unit or center will house, and that this act is immediately necessary to properly name the various units of the Department of Correction and to permit the proper designation of facilities hereafter constructed by the Department of Correction. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1981, No. 107, § 4: Feb. 19, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Section 7 of Act 377 of 1969 needs immediate amending because of the present requirement of the Department of Correction to transport an inmate to his former home or to the county in which he was committed; that this is an expensive and unnecessary financial burden on the taxpayers of this state; that all that is needed is for the Department of Correction to transport the inmate to the closest commercial transportation pick-up point. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1281, § 7: Apr. 21, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that on occasion the best interest of the releasee and state are served by a short delay in release in cases of mental or medical health cure need and that this act is immediately necessary to permit such delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 423, § 5: Mar. 10, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that without cost impact statements on bills which have an impact on prison populations the General Assembly cannot adequately review and debate those bills; the present law does not now require those cost impact statements; that this act will require cost impact statements on those bills and this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable to the Eighty-First General Assembly in its regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 788, § 1, provided:

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-28-101(a)(2) authorizes the Department of Correction to provide education and other rehabilitation and treatment programs designed to prepare inmates committed to the department for productive and law-abiding lives upon release from the Department of Correction; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-29-301 establishes the Department of Corrections School System to provide elementary, secondary, and vocational and technical education to qualified persons incarcerated in the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction and qualified persons supervised by the Department of Community Correction; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-29-101(d)(2) provides that inmates in the institutions of the Department of Correction may participate in and benefit from the vocational, educational, and rehabilitation services of their respective institutions solely within the rules and regulations of the department as determined by the director, subject to appeal and review by the Board of Corrections or a designated review board in accordance with procedures that shall be established by the board; and

“Whereas, the Corrections School System along with the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction have entered into agreements to provide college courses to qualified persons under Administrative Regulation 500 which are taught onsite by accredited college and universities.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(3); and added quotation marks around “unit” and “center” in (b).

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department”, and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (a)(2), (a)(3), and (b).

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section may be affected by Acts 1983, No. 774, § 4, which provided:

“All references in the laws of the State of Arkansas relating to execution by electrocution shall, insofar as such provisions are applicable, apply to, and mean, execution by lethal injection, except as to capital offenses already committed.”

Cross References. Method of execution, §5-4-617.

Making necessary financial arrangements;

Training staff;

Selecting service providers;

Overseeing the intervention measures;

Monitoring pay-for-success program participation; and

Designation of one (1) entity to serve as a liaison among all parties to the agreement.

(1)The Division of Correction, with the approval of the Board of Corrections, shall provide appropriate incarceration facilities for women, youthful offenders, and other adult offenders committed to the division by the courts of this state.

Any facility built or occupied by the division for use as a correctional facility shall be given a designated name of “unit” or “center” depending on its size, location, and purpose of usage.

The Department of Correction shall provide a death chamber within such facility or institution of the department as may be designated by the Director of the Department of Correction with the approval of the Board of Corrections.

The death chamber shall have all the necessary appliances for the proper execution of felons by electrocution.

All felons upon whom the death penalty has been imposed shall be executed in the death chamber.

Each of the following bills introduced in the General Assembly shall have a cost impact statement attached to the bill prior to the committee to which the bill is referred taking action in regard to the bill:

In addition, copies of the cost impact statement shall be furnished on the desk of each member of the Senate and of the House of Representatives at least one (1) day prior to the date on which the bill is on third reading and debated for final passage in the respective houses.

Cost impact statements required under this section shall be prepared, upon referral thereof by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, with respect to House of Representatives bills, and by the President of the Senate upon recommendation of the Senate Committee on Rules, Resolutions and Memorials, with respect to Senate bills, at the time of introduction thereof, to:

The cost impact statement shall be furnished to the Governor and to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives who shall cause copies thereof to be prepared for distribution upon the desks of the members of the House of Representatives and Senate at least twenty-four (24) hours prior to consideration of any such bill by committee or twenty-four (24) hours prior to the bill's being called up for third reading and final passage.

The cost impact statement shall be certified by the director or the director of the appropriate agency to which the bill is referred for preparation of an impact statement, and shall be returned and filed as required in this section within not more than five (5) days from the date of receipt thereof unless additional time in which to prepare the statement is granted by the requesting official.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-28-103, concerning cost impact statements, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1248, § 1. The former section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 701, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-182.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 788, § 1, provided:

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-28-101(a)(2) authorizes the Department of Correction to provide education and other rehabilitation and treatment programs designed to prepare inmates committed to the department for productive and law-abiding lives upon release from the Department of Correction; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-29-301 establishes the Department of Corrections School System to provide elementary, secondary, and vocational and technical education to qualified persons incarcerated in the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction and qualified persons supervised by the Department of Community Correction; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Code §12-29-101(d)(2) provides that inmates in the institutions of the Department of Correction may participate in and benefit from the vocational, educational, and rehabilitation services of their respective institutions solely within the rules and regulations of the department as determined by the director, subject to appeal and review by the Board of Corrections or a designated review board in accordance with procedures that shall be established by the board; and

“Whereas, the Corrections School System along with the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction have entered into agreements to provide college courses to qualified persons under Administrative Regulation 500 which are taught onsite by accredited college and universities.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly; and in (a), substituted “Parole Board” for “Post Prison Transfer Board” and inserted “the defendant in the case.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Corrections” for “Department of Correction” in (a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department” twice; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1).

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Cummins Unit, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 559, § 1. The subchapter was derived from Acts 1977, No. 466, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-100.2.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Women's Unit of the Department of Correction, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 559, § 2. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-28-301. Acts 1951, No. 351, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-801.

12-28-302. Acts 1951, No. 351, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-802.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Tucker Unit of the Department of Correction, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 559, §§ 3-6. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-28-401. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-908; Acts 1993, No. 658, § 2.

12-28-402. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-911.

12-28-403. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-910.

12-28-404. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-917.

12-28-405. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-912.